test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VLONG_NoExtra_aamoo_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     aamoo: aamoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1aamoo: niaamoo
     +Px2aamoo: giaamoo
     +Px3aamoo: oaamoo
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aamoo+Dim: aamooens
     aamoo+Con: aamooenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     aamoo+Pos: aamooim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     aamoo+Pej: aamooish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     aamoo+Pos1Pl: aamooinaan
     aamoo+PosPl: aamooiwaa
     aamoo+PosObv: aamooini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     aamoo+Pret: aamooiban
     aamoo+VocPl: aamoo***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     aamoo+Obv: aamooan
     aamoo+Pl: aamooag
     aamoo+Loc: aamooing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1aamoo+Dim: niaamooens
     +Px1aamoo+Con: niaamooenh
     +Px2aamoo+Dim: giaamooens
     +Px2aamoo+Con: giaamooenh
     +Px3aamoo+Dim: oaamooens
     +Px3aamoo+Con: oaamooenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1aamoo+Pos: niaamooim
     +Px2aamoo+Pos: giaamooim
     +Px3aamoo+Pos: oaamooim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1aamoo+Pej: niaamooish
     +Px2aamoo+Pej: giaamooish
     +Px3aamoo+Pej: oaamooish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1aamoo+Pos1Pl: niaamooinaan
     +Px1aamoo+PosPl: niaamooiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+PosObv: niaamooini
     +Px2aamoo+Pos1Pl: giaamooinaan
     +Px2aamoo+PosPl: giaamooiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+PosObv: giaamooini
     +Px3aamoo+Pos1Pl: oaamooinaan
     +Px3aamoo+PosPl: oaamooiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+PosObv: oaamooini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Pret: niaamooiban
     +Px1aamoo+VocPl: niaamoo***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Pret: giaamooiban
     +Px2aamoo+VocPl: giaamoo***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Pret: oaamooiban
     +Px3aamoo+VocPl: oaamoo***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Obv: niaamooan
     +Px1aamoo+Pl: niaamooag
     +Px1aamoo+Loc: niaamooing
     +Px2aamoo+Obv: giaamooan
     +Px2aamoo+Pl: giaamooag
     +Px2aamoo+Loc: giaamooing
     +Px3aamoo+Obv: oaamooan
     +Px3aamoo+Pl: oaamooag
     +Px3aamoo+Loc: oaamooing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     aamoo+Dim+Pos: aamooensim
     aamoo+Con+Pos: aamooenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     aamoo+Dim+Pej: aamooensish
     aamoo+Con+Pej: aamooenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: aamooensinaan
     aamoo+Dim+PosPl: aamooensiwaa
     aamoo+Dim+PosObv: aamooensini
     aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl: aamooenhinaan
     aamoo+Con+PosPl: aamooenhiwaa
     aamoo+Con+PosObv: aamooenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     aamoo+Dim+Pret: aamooensiban
     aamoo+Dim+VocPl: aamooens***idig, idog***
     aamoo+Con+Pret: aamooenhiban
     aamoo+Con+VocPl: aamooenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     aamoo+Dim+Obv: aamooensan
     aamoo+Dim+Pl: aamooensag
     aamoo+Dim+Loc: aamooensing
     aamoo+Con+Obv: aamooenhan
     aamoo+Con+Pl: aamooenhag
     aamoo+Con+Loc: aamooenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     aamoo+Pos+Pej: aamooimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: aamooiminaan
     aamoo+Pos+PosPl: aamooimiwaa
     aamoo+Pos+PosObv: aamooimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     aamoo+Pos+Pret: aamooimiban
     aamoo+Pos+VocPl: aamooim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     aamoo+Pos+Obv: aamooiman
     aamoo+Pos+Pl: aamooimag
     aamoo+Pos+Loc: aamooiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: aamooishinaan
     aamoo+Pej+PosPl: aamooishiwaa
     aamoo+Pej+PosObv: aamooishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     aamoo+Pej+Pret: aamooishiban
     aamoo+Pej+VocPl: aamooish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     aamoo+Pej+Obv: aamooishan
     aamoo+Pej+Pl: aamooishag
     aamoo+Pej+Loc: aamooishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pret: aamooinaaniban
     aamoo+Pos1Pl+VocPl: aamooinaan***idig, idog***
     aamoo+PosPl+Pret: aamooiwaaiban
     aamoo+PosPl+VocPl: aamooiwaa***idig, idog***
     aamoo+PosObv+Pret: aamooiniiban
     aamoo+PosObv+VocPl: aamooini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     aamoo+Pos1Pl+Obv: aamooinaanan
     aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pl: aamooinaanag
     aamoo+Pos1Pl+Loc: aamooinaaning
     aamoo+PosPl+Obv: aamooiwaaan
     aamoo+PosPl+Pl: aamooiwaaag
     aamoo+PosPl+Loc: aamooiwaaing
     aamoo+PosObv+Obv: aamooinian
     aamoo+PosObv+Pl: aamooiniag
     aamoo+PosObv+Loc: aamooiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     aamoo+Pret+Obv: aamooibanan
     aamoo+Pret+Pl: aamooibanag
     aamoo+Pret+Loc: aamooibaning
     aamoo+VocPl+Obv: aamoo***idig, idog***an
     aamoo+VocPl+Pl: aamoo***idig, idog***ag
     aamoo+VocPl+Loc: aamoo***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos: niaamooensim
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos: niaamooenhim
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos: giaamooensim
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos: giaamooenhim
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos: oaamooensim
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos: oaamooenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pej: niaamooensish
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pej: niaamooenhish
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pej: giaamooensish
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pej: giaamooenhish
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pej: oaamooensish
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pej: oaamooenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: niaamooensinaan
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+PosPl: niaamooensiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+PosObv: niaamooensini
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl: niaamooenhinaan
     +Px1aamoo+Con+PosPl: niaamooenhiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+Con+PosObv: niaamooenhini
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: giaamooensinaan
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+PosPl: giaamooensiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+PosObv: giaamooensini
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl: giaamooenhinaan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+PosPl: giaamooenhiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+Con+PosObv: giaamooenhini
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pos1Pl: oaamooensinaan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+PosPl: oaamooensiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+PosObv: oaamooensini
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pos1Pl: oaamooenhinaan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+PosPl: oaamooenhiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+Con+PosObv: oaamooenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pret: niaamooensiban
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+VocPl: niaamooens***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pret: niaamooenhiban
     +Px1aamoo+Con+VocPl: niaamooenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pret: giaamooensiban
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+VocPl: giaamooens***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pret: giaamooenhiban
     +Px2aamoo+Con+VocPl: giaamooenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pret: oaamooensiban
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+VocPl: oaamooens***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pret: oaamooenhiban
     +Px3aamoo+Con+VocPl: oaamooenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Obv: niaamooensan
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Pl: niaamooensag
     +Px1aamoo+Dim+Loc: niaamooensing
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Obv: niaamooenhan
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Pl: niaamooenhag
     +Px1aamoo+Con+Loc: niaamooenhing
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Obv: giaamooensan
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Pl: giaamooensag
     +Px2aamoo+Dim+Loc: giaamooensing
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Obv: giaamooenhan
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Pl: giaamooenhag
     +Px2aamoo+Con+Loc: giaamooenhing
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Obv: oaamooensan
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Pl: oaamooensag
     +Px3aamoo+Dim+Loc: oaamooensing
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Obv: oaamooenhan
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Pl: oaamooenhag
     +Px3aamoo+Con+Loc: oaamooenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+Pej: niaamooimish
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pej: giaamooimish
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pej: oaamooimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: niaamooiminaan
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+PosPl: niaamooimiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+PosObv: niaamooimini
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: giaamooiminaan
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosPl: giaamooimiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+PosObv: giaamooimini
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pos1Pl: oaamooiminaan
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosPl: oaamooimiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+PosObv: oaamooimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+Pret: niaamooimiban
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+VocPl: niaamooim***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pret: giaamooimiban
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+VocPl: giaamooim***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pret: oaamooimiban
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+VocPl: oaamooim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+Obv: niaamooiman
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+Pl: niaamooimag
     +Px1aamoo+Pos+Loc: niaamooiming
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Obv: giaamooiman
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Pl: giaamooimag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos+Loc: giaamooiming
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Obv: oaamooiman
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Pl: oaamooimag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos+Loc: oaamooiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: niaamooishinaan
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosPl: niaamooishiwaa
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+PosObv: niaamooishini
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: giaamooishinaan
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosPl: giaamooishiwaa
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+PosObv: giaamooishini
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pos1Pl: oaamooishinaan
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosPl: oaamooishiwaa
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+PosObv: oaamooishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pret: niaamooishiban
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+VocPl: niaamooish***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pret: giaamooishiban
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+VocPl: giaamooish***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pret: oaamooishiban
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+VocPl: oaamooish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Obv: niaamooishan
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Pl: niaamooishag
     +Px1aamoo+Pej+Loc: niaamooishing
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Obv: giaamooishan
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Pl: giaamooishag
     +Px2aamoo+Pej+Loc: giaamooishing
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Obv: oaamooishan
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Pl: oaamooishag
     +Px3aamoo+Pej+Loc: oaamooishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     +Px1aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pret: niaamooinaaniban
     +Px1aamoo+Pos1Pl+VocPl: niaamooinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+PosPl+Pret: niaamooiwaaiban
     +Px1aamoo+PosPl+VocPl: niaamooiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px1aamoo+PosObv+Pret: niaamooiniiban
     +Px1aamoo+PosObv+VocPl: niaamooini***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pret: giaamooinaaniban
     +Px2aamoo+Pos1Pl+VocPl: giaamooinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+PosPl+Pret: giaamooiwaaiban
     +Px2aamoo+PosPl+VocPl: giaamooiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px2aamoo+PosObv+Pret: giaamooiniiban
     +Px2aamoo+PosObv+VocPl: giaamooini***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pret: oaamooinaaniban
     +Px3aamoo+Pos1Pl+VocPl: oaamooinaan***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+PosPl+Pret: oaamooiwaaiban
     +Px3aamoo+PosPl+VocPl: oaamooiwaa***idig, idog***
     +Px3aamoo+PosObv+Pret: oaamooiniiban
     +Px3aamoo+PosObv+VocPl: oaamooini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     +Px1aamoo+Pos1Pl+Obv: niaamooinaanan
     +Px1aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pl: niaamooinaanag
     +Px1aamoo+Pos1Pl+Loc: niaamooinaaning
     +Px1aamoo+PosPl+Obv: niaamooiwaaan
     +Px1aamoo+PosPl+Pl: niaamooiwaaag
     +Px1aamoo+PosPl+Loc: niaamooiwaaing
     +Px1aamoo+PosObv+Obv: niaamooinian
     +Px1aamoo+PosObv+Pl: niaamooiniag
     +Px1aamoo+PosObv+Loc: niaamooiniing
     +Px2aamoo+Pos1Pl+Obv: giaamooinaanan
     +Px2aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pl: giaamooinaanag
     +Px2aamoo+Pos1Pl+Loc: giaamooinaaning
     +Px2aamoo+PosPl+Obv: giaamooiwaaan
     +Px2aamoo+PosPl+Pl: giaamooiwaaag
     +Px2aamoo+PosPl+Loc: giaamooiwaaing
     +Px2aamoo+PosObv+Obv: giaamooinian
     +Px2aamoo+PosObv+Pl: giaamooiniag
     +Px2aamoo+PosObv+Loc: giaamooiniing
     +Px3aamoo+Pos1Pl+Obv: oaamooinaanan
     +Px3aamoo+Pos1Pl+Pl: oaamooinaanag
     +Px3aamoo+Pos1Pl+Loc: oaamooinaaning
     +Px3aamoo+PosPl+Obv: oaamooiwaaan
     +Px3aamoo+PosPl+Pl: oaamooiwaaag
     +Px3aamoo+PosPl+Loc: oaamooiwaaing
     +Px3aamoo+PosObv+Obv: oaamooinian
